Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 103. Passing Causes to Supreme Court

§ 2421.
Repealed.
1959, No. 261, § 68.

§ 2422.
Appeal by State.

In a suit or prosecution in the name of the State, tried in the Superior Court, the determination of which may affect the title to the property or right of property of the State or a right or franchise of the State or of the public, an appeal may be taken by the State from the opinion of the court on questions of law arising on the trial, and the cause shall pass to the Supreme Court for determination, as in civil causes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 57;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§§ 2423-2428.
Repealed.
1959, No. 261, § 68.

§ 2429.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2430.
Repealed.
1959, No. 261, § 68.

§ 2431.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2432.
Passing causes to Supreme Court; recognizance in ejectment cases.

In actions brought under the provisions of sections 4851-4853 of this title, within three business days after judgment, the appealing party shall give security to the other party by way of recognizance or bond approved by the Court to pay the costs as the other party shall finally recover against him or her. If the appealing party is the defendant, he or she shall also give the security for rents then due and intervening rent. If final judgment is for the plaintiff, the costs, damages, and rents may be recovered by an action upon the recognizance or an action on contract founded on the judgment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 64;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 58, 237, eff. March 29, 1972;

2017, No. 11

, § 15.

§ 2433.
Repealed.
1959, No. 261, § 68.